Vermont statutes. Title 12 Court Procedure
Subchapter 4. Indictments and Presentments

§ 6041.
Indictment—perjury before court or tribunal.

Indictment Against a Person for Committing Perjury
Before a Court or Tribunal

STATE OF VERMONT,
Be it remembered that at a County, ss.
}
term of the Superior Court begun and held at within and for the county of , aforesaid, on the day of A.D. 20 , the grand jurors within and for such county of , upon their oath present, that A. B. of in the county of , at in such county of , on the day of A.D. 20 , appeared as a witness in a proceeding in which C.D. and E.F. were parties, then and there being heard before a tribunal of competent jurisdiction, () and committed the crime of perjury, by testifying in substance as follows: () which such testimony was material to the issue then and there pending in such proceeding, against the peace and dignity of the State. here specify the matter under consideration here set out the matter sworn to and alleged to be false

Click to view

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 6042.
Perjury before person or board authorized to examine witnesses.

Indictment Against a Person for Committing Perjury Before a Person, or Board Consisting of More Than One Person, Authorized by Law to Examine Witnesses Under Oath

STATE OF VERMONT,
Be it remembered that at a County, ss.
}
term of the Superior Court begun and held at , within and for the county of , aforesaid, on the day of A.D. 20, the grand jurors within and for the county of , upon their oath present that of in the county of on the day of A.D. 20, before () the said () then and there having authority to examine said () under oath () committed the crime of perjury, by testifying in substance as follows: () which said testimony was material in said proceeding, against the peace and dignity of the State. here insert the name of the person or board before whom the perjury was committed here insert the name of the person or board before whom the perjury was committed here insert name of respondent here specify the matter then under consideration here insert the matter claimed to be false

Click to view

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 6043.
Perjury in swearing to material matter in relation to which oath is authorized.

Indictment Against a Person for Committing Perjury in Swearing
or Affirming to a Material Matter in a Writing in Relation
to Which an Oath or Affirmation is Authorized by Law

STATE OF VERMONT,
Be it remembered that at a term County, ss.
}
of the Superior Court begun and held at , within and for the county of , aforesaid, on the day of A.D. 20 , the grand jurors within and for such county of , upon their oath present, that A. B. of in the county of , at in such county, on the day of A.D. 20 , before G. H., then and there having competent authority to administer oaths, committed the crime of perjury, by falsely swearing (or affirming) to material matter in writing required by law to be sworn to ) signed by said A. B., which material matter is in substance as follows: () against the peace and dignity of the State. (here insert substance of writing here set out the matter in such writing claimed to be false

Click to view

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974.

§ 6044.
Presentments for intoxication, breach of peace, and tramping.

The presentments for intoxication, breach of the peace, and tramping, as provided for in

13 V.S.A. § 5507

, shall be in substance as follows:

STATE OF VERMONT
County, ss.
} (INTOXICATION) To the (name of court) comes sheriff, constable, police officer (as the case may be) and upon his or her oath of office makes complaint that of in the county of at on the day of A. D. 20 , , contrary to the form of the statute, in such case made and provided, and against the peace and dignity of the State. became and was found intoxicated Dated at in the county of , this day of , A.D. 20

Click to view

(BREACH OF THE PEACE.)

Same as intoxication to italics, then in place of italics: “did disturb and break the public peace by tumultuous and offensive carriage, by threatening, quarreling, assaulting, beating, and striking (name of person assaulted).” Then continue as in intoxication after italics.

(TRAMPING.)

Same as intoxication to italics, then in place of italics: “was a transient person roving from place to place begging and living without labor or visible means of support.” Then continue as in intoxication after italics.

(TRAMPING.)

Same as intoxication to italics, then in place of italics: “did ride or attempt to ride on a railroad freight train and engine without to consent of the persons in charge thereof.” Then continue as in intoxication after italics.